Utah statutes.
53A-25b-303.   Educational programs.

(1)  The Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind shall provide an educational program for a student:

(a)  based on assessments of the student's abilities; and

(b)  in accordance with the student's IEP or Section 504 accommodation plan.

(2)  If a student's ability to access the core curriculum is impaired primarily due to a severe sensory loss, the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind shall provide an educational program that will enable the student, with accommodations, to access the core curriculum.

(3)  The Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind shall provide instruction in Braille to students who are blind as required by Chapter 25a, Blind Persons' Literacy Rights and Education Act.

